xetex/share/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyphen/uni-cyryoct.tex
% accompanying patterns for cyryo generated from ruhyphct.tex
% 2004-06-03 converted to Unicode for XeTeX, Jonathan Kew
%
\patterns{
а1бё
а1брё
а1бьё
а1вё
а1влё
а1врё
а1вьё
а1грё
а1двё
а1дё
а1длё
а1ё
а1жё
аз1вё
а1зё
а1кё
а1клё
а1лё
а1льё
а1мё
а1млё
а1мрё
а1мьё
а1нё
а1ньё
а1пё
а1плё
а1прё
а1птё
а1пьё
а1рё
а1рьё
6а1сё
а1скрё
а1стё
а1стрё
а1тё
а1трё
а1тьё
а1флё
а1чё
ачёс2
а1чьё
а1шё
а1шлё
а1шьё
а1щё
1бё
блё2с5к
в6нёс
5всём
2д1вё
дё5х
д5лёд
е1бё
е1блё
е1брё
е1бьё
2е1вё
е1влё
е1врё
е1глё
ег1нё
е1грё
е1дё
е1дрё
е1ё
е1жё
е1зё
е1клё
е1крё
е1лё
е1льё
е1мё
е1млё
ем1нё
е1мрё
е1нё
е6отё
е1пё
е1плё
еприё2
е1рё
ерё1г
е1рьё
е1сё
е1стё
е1стрё
е1твё
е1тё
е1тьё
е1чё
е1шё
е1шлё
е1щё
ё1ба
ё1бе
ё1бо
ё1бр
ё1бра
ё1бры
ё1бу
ё1бы
ё1ва
2ё1ве
ёв6ку
ё1во
2ёвр
ё1вра
ё1вре
ё2вро
ё1вру
ё1вры
ё1ву
ё1вы
ё1га
ё1ге
ё1ги
ё1го
ё1да
ё1де
ё1ди
ё2дл
ё1дла
ё1до
ё1дра
ё1дро
ё1дру
ё1дры
ё1ду
ё1жа
ёжа6т
ё1же
ё5жи
ё1жу
ё1жью
ё1за
ёз1да
ёз1ды
ё1зе
ё1зо
ё1зу
ё1зы
ё1ка
ё1ке
ё1ки
ё1кла
ё1кле
ё1кли
ё1кло
ё1клу
ё1клы
ёк1н
2ё1ко
ё1кра
ё1кре
ё1ку
ё1ла
ё1ле
ё1ло
ё1лу
ё1лы
ё1ма
ё1ме
ё1ми
ём1не
ё1мо
ё1му
ём1ч
ё1мы
ё1на
ё1не
ё1но
ё1ну
ё1ны
ё1па
ё1пе
ё1пла
ё1пле
ё1пло
ё1плу
ё1плы
ё1по
ё1пта
ё1пты
ё1пу
ё1пы
ё1ра
ё1ре
ё1ро
ёр5тли
ё1ру
ё1ры
ё1рье
ё1рью
ё1рья
ё1са
ё1се
ё1си
ё1ск
ё1со
ё1ста
ё5ста.
ё1сте
ё1сто
ё1стра
ё1стре
ё1стро
ё1стру
ё1стры
ё1сту
ё1сты
ё1су
ё1сы
ё1сье
ё1сьи
ё1сью
ё1сья
ё1та
ё1те
ё1ти
ё1тл
ё1то
ё1тра
ё1тре
ё1тро
ё1тру
ё1тры
ё1ту
ё1ты
ё1тю
ё1тя
ё1ха
ё1хе
ё1хи
ёх1м
ё1хо
ё1ху
ё1це
ё1че
ё1чи
ё1ша
ё1ше
ё1ши
ё1шу
ё1ща
ё1ще
ё1щи
ё1щу
3жёв
5жёг
ж2жё
заё6
з1дё
6з1нё
и1бё
и1бьё
и1вё
и1влё
и1врё
и1вьё
и1грё
и1дё
и1ё
и1жё
и1зё
и1кё
и1клё
и1лё
и1льё
6именё
и1мё
и1нё
и1пё
и1плё
и1прё
и1рё
и1сё
и1стё
ис1тёк
и1стрё
и1тё
и1трё
и1тьё
и1флё
и1чё
и1чьё
и1шё
и1шлё
и1шьё
и1щё
1каё
1кё
л1жё
5л6жёш
л1зё
л5чё
5мёд
1мён.
2мрё
1мщё
на1ч2нё
6нёвк
нё2вра
нёв1ро
но5ё
о1бё
.об1лё
о1блё
.об1рё
о1брё
о1бьё
о1вё
о1влё
о1врё
о1вьё
о1грё
о1двё
о1дё
о1длё
о1дрё
о1ё
о2ёт
о1жё
о1жьё
о1зё
ои2мё
о1клё
о1лё
о1льё
о1мё
о1млё
о1м1рё
о1нё
о1ньё
опалё5
о1пё
о1плё
о1прё
о1пьё
о1рё
о1рьё
о1сё
о1скрё
о1снё
о1стё
о1стрё
о1счё
о1твё
о1тё
о1трё
о1тьё
о1фё
ох5лё
о1чё
о1шё
о1шлё
о1шьё
о1щё
пёр1о
причё2с1к
5п6чённ
ра2с1тёр
рё5жь
1рёза
рё2х1р
рог1нё
р1тё
с3дё
1сё
5сёк
1с2клё
с1мёт
2стёрл
2стёс
с1тлё
счё2с1к
съё5ма
съё3мо
1течё
тёг1н
1тёка
1тёкш
тём5н
1тёрл
тё2х1о
трё2х
5тушёв
у1бё
у1блё
у1брё
у1бьё
у1вё
у1влё
у1вьё
у1глё
у1грё
у1дё
у1дрё
у1ё
у5ём.
у1жё
у1жьё
2у5лё
у1льё
у1мё
у6миё
у1млё
у1мрё
у1нё
у1пё
у1плё
у1прё
у1пьё
у1рё
у1рьё
у1сё
у1стё
у1тё
у1трё
у1тьё
у1флё
у1чё
у1чьё
у1шё
у1шлё
у1щё
фё5д
2х1вё
.ча2ё
1чёл
шё2п1т
ъё2
ъём5н
ы1бё
ы1вё
ы1дё
ы1дрё
ы1жё
ы1зё
ы1лё3
ы1льё
ы1мё
ы1млё
ы1плё
ы1рё
ырё2х5
ы1рьё
ы1сё
ы1стрё
ы1тьё
ы1чё
ы1шлё
ь1вё
ь2щё
ю1блё
ю1дё
ю1ё
ю1нё
ю1чё
я1брё
я1дё
я1дрё
я1жё
я1зё
я1млё
я1нё
я1пьё
я1рё
я1сё
я1тё
я1чё
я1щё
}
